Wisconsin, session 2025, SB1109.
do enact as follows:SB1109,14Section 1. 20.255 (2) (e) of the statutes is created to read:SB1109,2,2120.255 (2) (e) Student teacher compensation grants. A sum sufficient for aid 2under s. 118.237 to pay student teachers an hourly wage.SB1109,23Section 2. 118.237 of the statutes is created to read:SB1109,2,44118.237 Student teachers; compensation. (1) In this section:SB1109,2,85(a) “Institution of higher education” means a postsecondary institution 6located in this state that provides an educational program for which it awards a 7bachelor’s or higher degree and that is listed in the U.S. department of education’s 8database of accredited postsecondary institutions and programs.SB1109,2,119(b) “Student teacher” means an individual enrolled in an institution of higher 10education who is participating in the student teaching component of a teacher 11preparatory program approved under s. 115.28 (7) (a).SB1109,2,1612(2) Beginning in the 2026-27 school year, a school board shall pay a student 13teacher who is participating in the student teaching component of a teacher 14preparatory program at a school in the school district an hourly wage of at least $15 15for the hours the student teacher participates in the student teaching component in 16the school district.SB1109,3,217(3) Annually on the 3rd Monday of June, for each student teacher who 18participated in the student teaching component of a teacher preparatory program 19in a school district during the preceding school term, the department shall pay the 20school board of the school district an amount determined by multiplying $15 times 21the number of hours the student teacher participated in the student teaching 22component of the teacher preparatory program in the school district during the 23preceding school term, as reported to the department by the school board. The 1department shall make payments under this subsection from the appropriation 2under s. 20.255 (2) (e).SB1109,3,33(4) The department may promulgate rules to administer this section.SB1109,34Section 3. 119.04 (1) of the statutes, as affected by 2025 Wisconsin Act 79, is 5amended to read:SB1109,3,196119.04 (1) Subchapters IV, V and VII of ch. 115, ch. 121 and ss. 66.0235 (3) (c), 766.0603 (1m) to (3), 115.01 (1) and (2), 115.28, 115.31, 115.33, 115.34, 115.343, 8115.345, 115.363, 115.364, 115.365 (3), 115.366, 115.367, 115.38 (2), 115.415, 9115.445, 118.001 to 118.04, 118.045, 118.06, 118.07, 118.075, 118.076, 118.10, 10118.12, 118.124, 118.125 to 118.14, 118.145 (4), 118.15, 118.153, 118.16, 118.162, 11118.163, 118.164, 118.18, 118.19, 118.196, 118.20, 118.223, 118.225, 118.237, 12118.24 (1), (2) (c) to (f), (6), (8), and (10), 118.245, 118.25, 118.255, 118.291, 118.292, 13118.293, 118.2935, 118.30 to 118.43, 118.46, 118.50, 118.51, 118.52, 118.53, 118.55, 14118.56, 118.58, 120.12 (2m), (4m), (5), (15) to (27), and (29), 120.125, 120.13 (1), (2) 15(b) to (g), (3), (14), (17) to (19), (26), (34), (35), (37), (37m), and (38), 120.137, 120.14, 16120.20, 120.21 (3), and 120.25 are applicable to a 1st class city school district and 17board but not, unless explicitly provided in this chapter or in the terms of a 18contract, to the commissioner or to any school transferred to an opportunity schools 19and partnership program.SB1109,3,2020